Hawaii statutes.
[§21D‑2] Purpose. The purpose of
the ACCESS/legislative information service is to provide certain legislative
information and services prepared by the legislature through one or more
on-line information networks and to increase the accessibility by the public
and state government to information and services. [L 1990, c 348, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next